Alabama, session 2026rs, SB221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) As used in this section, the following
terms have the following meanings:
(1) CREDIT CARD. Any card, plate, coupon book, or other
credit device existing for the purpose of obtaining money,
property, labor, or services on credit. The term shall also
mean any card or other payment code or device issued or
approved for use through a payment card network to debit an
asset account, regardless of the purpose for which the account
is established, whether authorization is based on signature,
personal identification number, or other means. The term
includes a general-use prepaid card, as defined in 15 U.S.C. §
16931-1(a)(2)(A). The term does not include paper checks.
(2) ELECTRONIC PAYMENT TRANSACTION. A transaction in
which a person uses a debit card, credit card, or other
payment code or device issued or approved through a payment
card network to debit a deposit account or use a line of
credit, whether authorization is based on a signature,
personal identification number, or other means.
(3) CREDIT CARD TRANSACTION FEE. A fee assessed on
purchases made by debit or credit card to offset interchange
Page 1

purchases made by debit or credit card to offset interchange
SB221 Enrolled
fees charged to a merchant or seller.
(b) The amount of any credit card transaction fee
charged for an electronic payment transaction shall be
excluded from the amount on which basis sales and use tax is
assessed for that electronic payment transaction.
(c) The Department of Revenue shall establish rules to
administer the provisions of this act.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on September
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
SB221 Enrolled






________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate



________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives


SB221
Senate 19-Mar-26
I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
the Senate.

Patrick Harris,
Secretary.




House of Representatives
Passed: 08-Apr-26




By: Senator Orr
Page 3